Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,281
Protective helmets; conformance with federal standards; effect.

Any person using a protective helmet purchased prior to July 9, 1988, which is labeled to show that it conforms with applicable federal motor vehicle safety standards shall be deemed to be in compliance with section 60-6,279.

Laws 1988, LB 428, § 4;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-6,213;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 377.